Hawaii, session 2025, SB1557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to the Constitution of the State of Hawaii to add a new article to provide for a citizens' assembly and to authorize the citizens assembly to propose to the legislature constitutional and statutory revisions or amendments to the laws governing elections, political campaigns, campaign finance, ethics, referendum, reapportionment, legislative process, and public access to information. SECTION 2. The Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new article to be designated and to read as follows: "ARTICLE II.A Citizens' Assembly Section 1.  There shall be established a citizens' assembly to consider and propose to the legislature constitutional and statutory revisions or amendments to the laws governing elections, political campaigns, campaign finance, reapportionment, legislative process, ethics and public access to information. The citizens' assembly shall be composed of twenty‑five members who are registered voters in the State and who are selected at random from population categories that are broadly representative of the adult population of the State as to age, gender, ethnicity, socioeconomic status and geographical distribution. Section 2.  The citizens' assembly shall convene in 2026, starting in July, and every four years thereafter, and shall disband after the next general election.  The citizens' assembly shall provide the public with the opportunity to make recommendations to the citizens' assembly, in writing, orally at public meetings or by other means. The legislature shall provide for the method for selecting the members of the citizens' assembly, the necessary facilities and equipment for the assembly and for expenses incurred in the conduct of the assembly." SECTION 3. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the state constitution be amended to provide for a citizens' assembly and to authorize the citizens' assembly to propose to the legislature constitutional and statutory revisions or amendments to the laws governing elections, political campaigns, campaign finance, reapportionment, legislative process, ethics, and public access to information?" SECTION 4. New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________